North Carolina, session 2025, SB184.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 162A-203 reads as rewritten:
"§ 162A-203. Authorization of system development fee.
(a) A local governmental unit may adopt a system development fee for water or sewer
service only in accordance with the conditions and limitations of this Article.
(b) A system development fee adopted by a local governmental unit under any lawful
authority other than this Article and in effect on October 1, 2017, shall be conformed to the
requirements of this Article not later than July 1, 2018.
(c) A local government unit or a joint agency created pursuant to G.S. 160A-461 may
exempt affordable housing parcels from a system development fee imposed pursuant to this
Article. The unit or joint agency shall adopt criteria for determining whether a parcel qualifies
for the exemption."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S184-v-1*